Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 86.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
81-3432
Engineers and
Architects Regulation Fund; created; use; investment.

The
Engineers and Architects Regulation Fund is created. The secretary of the
board shall receive and account for all money derived from the operation of
the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act and shall remit the money to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Engineers and Architects Regulation Fund.
All expenses certified by the board as properly and necessarily incurred in
the discharge of duties, including compensation and administrative staff,
and any expense incident to the administration of the act relating to other
states shall be paid out of the fund. Loan repayments payable pursuant to
section 81-3432.01 shall be paid out of the fund. Warrants for the payment
of expenses shall be issued by the Director of Administrative Services and
paid by the State Treasurer upon presentation of vouchers regularly drawn
by the chairperson and secretary of the board and approved by the board. At
no time shall the total amount of warrants exceed the total amount of the
fees collected under the act and to the credit of the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
at the direction of the Legislature through June 30, 2011. Any
money in the Engineers and Architects Regulation Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 32;

Laws 2009, LB446, § 2;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 86.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.